Virginia statutes. Title 5.1. Aviation.
Article 7. Bonds or Insurance.

§ 5.1-116.
Bonds, insurance or certificate of insurance required prior to issuance of certificate or permit.

No certificate or permit shall be issued by the Commission to any air carrier until and after such air carrier shall have filed with, and the same has been approved by, the Commission, an insurance policy, bond or certificate of insurance in lieu thereof, certifying that such policy or bond covers the liability of such air carrier in accordance with the provisions of this article, issued by an insurance company or association or other insurer authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth, or bonds, to an amount approved by the Commission, of the Commonwealth of Virginia, of the United States of America, or of any municipality in this Commonwealth. Such state, federal, or municipal bonds shall be deposited with the State Treasurer, and such surety shall not be reduced during the life of such certificate or permit, except in accordance with an order of the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-170; 1970, c. 708; 1975, c. 211.

§ 5.1-117.
Bonds or insurance to be kept in force.

Each holder of a certificate or permit issued by the Commission shall also keep in force at all times insurance or a bond underwritten by an insurer approved or authorized to do business in Virginia, or by one who is eligible as a surplus lines insurer in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 48 (§

38.2-4805.1

et seq.) of Title 38.2 in amounts of not less than the following minimum limits: (a) liability for bodily injury to or death to any one person, passenger or other, aboard the aircraft, $75,000; and a limit for each occurrence in any one aircraft of at least an amount equal to the sum produced by multiplying $75,000 by seventy-five percent of the total number of passenger seats installed in the aircraft; and for the loss or damage to cargo owned by other than the insured, at least $10,000 for each occurrence; provided, however, that a holder of a permit issued by the Commission shall not be required to file any cargo insurance, bond or bonds for cargo liability for the hauling of property transported under contract. However, in no event shall the limits required herein for air common carriers be less than those prescribed for like carriers by the Civil Aeronautics Board or the Federal Aviation Administration.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-171; 1970, c. 708.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “38.2-4805.1” was substituted for “38.2-4800.”

§ 5.1-118.
Policies, bonds or certificates to be filed with Commission; securities deposited in lieu thereof.

Each holder of a certificate or permit issued by the Commission shall keep on file with the Commission an insurance policy, bond or certificate of insurance in lieu thereof, certifying that such policy or bond covers the liability of such air carrier in accordance with the provisions of this article, issued by an insurance company or association or other insurer authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth, and such insurance, bond or certificate of insurance filed with the Commission shall be kept in full force at all times. The policy, bond or certificate of insurance shall remain in the files of the Commission six months after the insurance or bond has expired or has been cancelled for any cause. If federal, state or municipal bonds are deposited with the State Treasurer in lieu thereof, such bonds shall remain so deposited until six months after the authority for use of equipment insured has expired or is cancelled for any cause, unless otherwise ordered by the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-172; 1970, c. 708; 1975, c. 211.

§ 5.1-119.
Condition of bond, etc.

The insurance bond, or other security, shall obligate the insurer or surety to pay any final judgment for damages sustained by the passengers, shippers, or consignees for injury to any passenger or passengers, or for loss or damage to property entrusted to such air carrier when a cargo policy is required, and for any and all injuries to persons and loss of, or damage to, property resulting from the negligent operation of any aircraft.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-173; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-120.
Effect of failure to give security.

Failure of any holder of a certificate or permit issued by and under the authority of the Commission to comply with any of the requirements of §§ 5.1-116, 5.1-117 or 5.1-118 shall be cause without further proceedings for the revocation or suspension of the certificate or permit, and upon further proceedings for the imposition of a fine not exceeding $1,000.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-174; 1970, c. 708.